Nebraska, session 109, LB338.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB338 LB338
2025 2025
Section 1. The Legislature hereby finds that:
(1) Recent advances in genetic science have led to improvements in
the diagnosis, treatment, and understanding of a significant number of
human diseases;
(2) Genetic testing can help individuals take steps to avoid disease
entirely or identify disease earlier, maximizing an individual's health
and lifespan and reducing health care costs for patients, families, and
communities in the long term;
(3) Concerns about ability to access insurance create a disincentive
from seeking genetic testing for some individuals, preventing the full
realization of opportunity for genetic testing;
(4) The Genetic Information Nondiscrimination Act of 2008, 29 U.S.C.
1182, prohibits genetic information from being used as a condition of
eligibility, to set premium rates, or impose preexisting condition
exclusions for health insurance;
(5) The intent of section 2 of this act is to reduce barriers to the
benefits of genetic testing by protecting genetic information from being
used to impact access to life insurance, group disability insurance, or
long-term care insurance coverage.
Sec. 2. (1) In the absence of clinical diagnosis of a condition,
life insurers, disability insurers, and long-term care insurers shall
not:
(a) Cancel, limit, or deny coverage, or establish differentials in
premium rates based on genetic information collected, used, or stored for
health care treatment; or
(b) Require or solicit genetic information, use genetic test
results, or consider an individual's decision or action relating to
genetic testing in any manner or for any purpose related to life
insurance, disability insurance, or long-term care insurance.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
(a) Prevent life insurers, disability insurers, and long-term care
-2-

LB338 LB338
2025 2025
insurers from reviewing an individual's medical record as part of an
application exam;
(b) Prohibit requiring an applicant for insurance coverage to answer
questions regarding family history; or
(c) Prohibit a life insurer, disability insurer, or long-term care
insurer from considering a clinical diagnosis included in an individual's
medical record for insurance purposes.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) Genetic information has the same meaning as defined in section
48-236; and
(b) Genetic test has the same meaning as defined in section 48-236.
-3-